California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
A county welfare department may, without the need to provide written documentation that consent has been obtained from a client, provide information to a housing authority created pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 34200) of Division 24 of the Health and Safety Code, in order to aid the housing authority in the administration of that part. This section may be implemented either through an automated data exchange system or through a manual system. Any housing authority receiving and maintaining information pursuant to this section shall comply with confidentiality and privacy laws concerning the collection, maintenance, and dissemination of information, as contained in Section 10850 and the federal Privacy Act of 1974, contained in Section 552a of Title 5 of the United States Code. The county welfare department shall provide a written form to each person about whom information is to be provided to a housing authority pursuant to this section. The form shall notify the person that the information exchanges may occur. A copy of the form may be retained by the person and the county welfare department. The form shall specify the purpose for which the information has been solicited, the entities to which the information may be provided, the uses that may be made of the information, as set forth in Section 552a(e)(3) of Title 5 of the United States Code, and the right of the client to request review of the information that has been provided to the authority. The county welfare department may provide only information that is necessary to determine eligibility for housing authority programs or services for which the client has applied or which he or she is receiving. The county welfare department shall allow the client to review the information it has provided to a housing authority, upon request of the client. This section is not intended to eliminate any other legal obligation of the county welfare department to obtain consent from a client before releasing information to another entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 985, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10850.6.

Notwithstanding Section 10850, the State Department of Social Services shall provide the State Department of Developmental Services with CalWORKs and CalFresh eligibility and enrollment data for consumers served by the State Department of Developmental Services for the purposes of monitoring and evaluating employment outcomes to determine the effectiveness of the Employment First Policy established pursuant to Section 4689. This information shall be provided to the extent permitted under applicable federal statutes and regulations. The State Department of Developmental Services shall maintain the confidentiality of any information provided to it by the State Department of Social Services to the same extent as if the State Department of Developmental Services had acquired the information directly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 305.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10850.7.

(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 10850, an authorized employee of a county welfare department may disclose confidential information concerning a public social services applicant or recipient to any law enforcement agency where the applicant or recipient is deceased. Information that may be released pursuant to this section shall be limited to the name, address, telephone number, birthdate, social security number, and physical description of the applicant for, or recipient of, public social services.

A county welfare department may release the information specified by this section to any law enforcement agency only upon a written request from the head of the agency specifying that the applicant or recipient is deceased and that the agency is otherwise unable to adequately identify the deceased. The information specified may alternatively be released by telephone, whereupon the head of the law enforcement agency shall submit the request in writing within five days of the release.

(b) This section shall not be construed to authorize the release of a general list identifying individuals applying for or receiving public social services. 

(c) The provisions of this section shall be operative only to the extent permitted by federal law. The section shall not apply to, but shall exclude the Medi-Cal program established pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) and following.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 905, Sec. 2.   Effective September 19, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

10850.8.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 10850, the State Department of Social Services shall provide the Franchise Tax Board with information necessary to verify foster care status for the sole purpose of determining eligibility for the foster youth tax credit described in Section 17052.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) The provisions of this section shall be operative only to the extent permitted by federal law.

(c) The State Department of Social Services shall seek any federal approval necessary to implement subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 72, Sec. 5.   (SB 201)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10850.9.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 10850, an authorized employee of a county social services department may disclose the name, residential address, telephone number, and email address of elderly or disabled individuals receiving services to police, fire, paramedical personnel, or other designated emergency services personnel, in the event of a public safety emergency that necessitates the possible evacuation of the area in which those elderly or disabled clients reside. Those public safety emergencies include, but are not limited to, fires, earthquakes, gas leaks, bomb scares, public safety power shutoffs, and other natural or human-made occurrences that jeopardize the immediate physical safety
 of county residents.

(2) If a county social services agency intends to disclose information pursuant to paragraph (1), it shall notify elderly or disabled individuals receiving services, at the time the individual is enrolled in services or at the time of the agency’s next contact with the individual, whichever comes first, of that fact. Beginning on January 1, 2022, the individual shall have the option to opt out of having their name, residential address, telephone number, and email address disclosed as described in paragraph (1).

(A) Information disclosed pursuant to paragraph (1) shall
 be used only by the receiving entity to provide emergency services in the event of a public safety emergency that necessitates the possible evacuation of the area in which an elderly or disabled individual resides.

(B) However, in the event of a public safety power shutoff, the county may disclose information pursuant to paragraph (1) to the extent necessary to prepare an individual for the loss of power and to ensure their safety and well-being within 48 hours preceding and following the event. 

(b) The Director of Social Services shall seek any federal approval necessary to implement subdivision (a).

(c) Subdivision (a) shall be implemented only if the director executes
 a declaration, that shall be retained by the director, stating that any federal approval required for implementation of subdivision (a) has been obtained, and only for the duration of that approval.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 98, Sec. 5.   (AB 2213)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10851.

(a) Each county shall establish and maintain a case record for each public social services case and shall retain the record for a period of three years. The three-year retention period begins on the date on which public social services were last provided. The records shall be retained beyond the three-year retention period when the county is notified by the department or the State Department of Health Services, whichever has jurisdiction over the records, to retain records for a longer period of time. The department or the State Department of Health Services, whichever has jurisdiction over the records, shall instruct a county to retain records beyond the three-year period when the retention is necessary to a pending civil or criminal action. 

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the board of supervisors of any county may authorize the destruction of the case narrative portions of the case record that are over three years old in any case file, active or inactive, only after audit by the department or the State Department of Health Services, whichever has jurisdiction over the record. In addition, the board may also authorize the destruction of those documents contained in the case file that are over three years old and are no longer necessary to document the recipient’s continued eligibility for public social services. However, if a civil or criminal action against a person based on alleged unlawful application for, or receipt of, public social services, is commenced before the expiration of the three-year period, no portion of the case record of the person shall be destroyed until the action is terminated.

(c) Each county shall maintain fiscal, statistical, and other records necessary for maintaining accountability and meeting reporting requirements relating to the administration of public social services. These fiscal and reporting records shall be retained for a minimum period of three years from the date of submission of the final expenditure report and shall be retained beyond the three-year period when audit findings have not been resolved. 

(d) The retention requirements imposed by subdivisions (a) and (c) of this section are for public social services purposes only and are superseded to the extent another statute requires retention of the same records for a longer period for a different purpose. 

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), or any other statutory requirement concerning the retention of public social services records, a child protective services agency may, but need not, retain a child abuse report that has been determined to be an unfounded report, as defined in Section 11165.12 of the Penal Code.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a county may retain a case record established pursuant to subdivision (a), and retained pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (c), using either electronic or other alternative storage technologies. Permissible alternative storage technologies shall include, but not be limited to, photography, microphotography, electronically recorded video images on magnetic surfaces, electronic data processing systems, optical disk storage, or any other electronic medium that is a trusted system and that does not permit additions, deletions, or changes to the original document and meets Section 12168.7 for recording of permanent records or nonpermanent records. A duplicate copy of any record reproduced shall be deemed an original.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 569, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10851.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 10851, each county shall retain all records that are necessary to determine the number of months each adult recipient has received aid subject to the time limits provided in Section 11454 and Section 608(a)(7) of Title 42 of the United States Code. The county shall retain the records for the period of time established by the department by regulation.

(b) Each county shall provide case record information to the department’s automated system for tracking the period of time a recipient has received aid. Each county shall provide information, as determined by the department, to the department’s automated system that is sufficient to allow reliable determinations of the number of months each adult recipient of aid has received aid for purposes of Section 11454 and Section 608(a)(7) of Title 42 of the United States Code. The department shall, pursuant to the adoption of emergency regulations, specify the case record information that each county shall provide under this section.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), if a county cannot provide sufficient information to the automated system, the county shall maintain the information in a nonautomated format, and shall promptly provide that information to any county requesting this information to accurately determine time on aid and enforce time limits.

(d) Any county that fails to provide information required by subdivision (b) or (c) shall be subject to the following:

(1) To the extent that the failure to provide or maintain reliable time clock information results in an audit exception, the costs associated with that exception shall be passed on to the county responsible for the exception unless the county can demonstrate that the costs would have been incurred if the county had provided the information in subdivision (b). In such a case, this amount shall be applied as a reduction in the county’s single allocation under Section 15204.2.

(2) Increased program costs resulting from a court order requiring the department to provide additional months of eligibility to any adult aid recipient due to the failure to reliably determine the number of months each adult recipient has received aid for purposes of Section 11454 shall be passed on to the county responsible for the failure unless the county can demonstrate that the costs would have been incurred if the county had provided the information required in subdivision (b). The county’s single allocation under Section 15204.2 shall be reduced by an amount of the increased program costs resulting from a court order that is proportionate to the responsible county’s caseload.

(e) The department, by regulation, shall establish good cause standards and an appeal process.

(f) In any fiscal year in which a county is assessed a cost under subdivision (d), the county shall expend additional funds to replace any reduction in the single allocation resulting from the penalty.

(g) The department shall adopt regulations to implement this section in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The initial adoption of any emergency regulations and one readoption of the initial regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare. The initial emergency regulations and one readoption of those regulations shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and publication in the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 111, Sec. 28.   Effective July 30, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10852.

All persons who are subject to investigation or supervision by the department, or who are connected with any institution subject to such investigation or supervision, or who are in any way responsible for the administration or expenditure of funds which are subject to investigation or supervision by the department, shall furnish to the department such information and statistics as it may request or require, and shall allow the department free access to all such institutions and to all records of such institutions and persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

10853.

In order to secure accuracy, uniformity, and completeness in such statistics and information, the department, by regulation, may prescribe forms of report and records to be kept by all persons, associations, or institutions subject to investigation or supervision by the department, and each such person, association, or institution shall keep such records and render such reports in conformity with the forms so prescribed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Personnel [10900. - 10909.]

10900.

The department shall, within the limits of funds made available, provide welfare personnel training courses and services, including in-service training, educational leaves or stipends, traineeships, internships, and the expansion of fieldwork training facilities within county departments for the use of colleges and universities in preparing students for employment in the administration of public social services programs. The training courses and services provided pursuant to this section shall be designed to promote welfare personnel training in every county in this state, which will provide the quality and quantity of trained personnel required to eliminate or reduce the circumstances or conditions which impede or prevent an individual or a family from making progress toward proper social adjustment, self-support, and self-direction.

In-service training for county employees who engage in the determination of eligibility for public social services shall include special training in techniques designed to enable such employees to identify applications for public social services which require special investigation pursuant to Section 11055.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1688.)
-------------------------------------------

10905.

If, when, and during such times as the federal government allots money to this state for training grants for public social services personnel, pursuant to Title VII of the Federal Social Security Act, the State Department of Health Services with respect to health care services, and the State Department of Social Services with respect to other social services, are authorized to act as the agents and representatives of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10906.

Employees of the State Department of Social Services or the State Department of Health Services who are engaged in the administration of public social services are authorized (1) to attend courses of training provided by institutions of higher learning, (2) to attend special courses of study or seminars of short duration conducted by experts on a temporary basis for the purpose, (3) to accept fellowships or traineeships at institutions of higher learning with such stipends as are permitted by regulations of the federal government.

Any leave of absence granted to any employee of these departments, as authorized by this section, shall be subject to the approval of the State Personnel Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10907.

The board of supervisors of any county may grant to any permanent employee of the county department a leave of absence with pay to attend an institution of learning for the purpose of improving his skill, knowledge and technique in the administration of social welfare programs which will benefit the county department.

In order to be eligible for an educational leave, the employee must have a satisfactory service record with the county and must execute an agreement to return to the county department to render one year of service. The employee shall furnish a suitable bond indemnifying the county against possible loss in the event the employee fails to return to the county and render the required period of service stipulated in the agreement. Such bond shall be exonerated in the event the failure of the employee to render the stipulated period of service is caused by death, physical or mental disability of the employee. If the board of supervisors finds, and by resolution declares, that the interests of the county will be protected by written agreement of the employee to return to the service of the county and render at least one year of service therein following his return from leave, the board of supervisors may waive the furnishing of the bond.

The terms and amount of pay or stipend to be paid shall be set by the board of supervisors. Any such pay or stipend shall be considered a proper charge against the administration of the public welfare programs.

Notwithstanding any other provisions in this section to the contrary, the board of supervisors may provide educational leaves to employees under such conditions as may be prescribed in an agreement or plan entered into by this state with the federal government.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

10908.

Any officers and employees of the Department of Social Welfare performing a function on January 1, 1970, that is transferred to the State Personnel Board, shall, pursuant to Section 19370 of the Government Code, be transferred to the State Personnel Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 504.)
-------------------------------------------

10909.

All regulations prior to January 1, 1970, adopted by the State Department of Social Welfare under Welfare and Institutions Code Section 10901 shall remain in effect and shall be enforceable by the State Personnel Board until amended, repealed, or otherwise superseded by regulations adopted by the State Personnel Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 504.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Hearings [10950. - 10967.]

10950.

(a) If any applicant for or recipient of public social services is dissatisfied with any action of the county department relating to his or her application for or receipt of public social services, if his or her application is not acted upon with reasonable promptness, or if any person who desires to apply for public social services is refused the opportunity to submit a signed application therefor, and is dissatisfied with that refusal, he or she shall, in person or through an authorized representative, without the necessity of filing a claim with the board of supervisors, upon filing a request with the State Department of Social Services or the State Department of Health Care Services, whichever department administers the public social service, be accorded an opportunity for a state hearing.

(b) (1) The requirements of Sections 100506.2 and 100506.4 of the Government Code apply to state hearings regarding eligibility for or enrollment in an insurance affordability program administered by the State Department of Health Care Services to the extent that those sections conflict with the state hearing requirements under this chapter.

(2) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, or make specific this subdivision by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until the time regulations are adopted. The department shall adopt regulations by July 1, 2017, in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of
 Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, beginning July 1, 2015, the department shall provide a semiannual status report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, until regulations have been adopted.

(3) This subdivision shall be implemented only to the extent it does not conflict with federal law.

(c) Priority in setting and deciding cases shall be given in those cases in which aid is not being provided pending the outcome of the hearing. This priority shall not be construed to permit or excuse the failure to render decisions within the time allowed under federal and state law.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, there is no right to a state hearing when either (1) state or federal law requires
 automatic grant adjustments for classes of recipients unless the reason for an individual request is incorrect grant computation, or (2) the sole issue is a federal or state law requiring an automatic change in services or medical assistance which adversely affects some or all recipients.

(e) For the purposes of administering health care services and medical assistance, the Director of Health Care Services shall have those powers and duties conferred on the Director of Social Services by this chapter to conduct state hearings in order to secure approval of a state plan under applicable federal law.

(f) The Director of Health Care Services may contract with the State Department of Social Services for the provisions of state hearings in accordance with this chapter.

(g) For purposes of this chapter, the following terms
 have the following meanings:

(1) “Adverse benefit determination” means, in the case of a Medi-Cal managed care plan, any of the following:

(A) The denial or limited authorization of a requested service, including determinations based on the type or level of service, requirements for medical necessity, appropriateness, setting, or effectiveness of a covered benefit.

(B) The reduction, suspension, or termination of a previously authorized service.

(C) The denial, in whole or in part, of payment for a service.

(D) The failure to provide services in a timely manner, as described in Section 14197.

(E) The failure of a Medi-Cal
 managed care plan to act within the timeframes provided in Section 438.408(b)(1) and Section 438.408(b)(2) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations regarding the standard resolution of grievances and appeals.

(F) For a resident of a rural area with only one Medi-Cal managed care plan, excluding a Medi-Cal managed care plan defined in subparagraphs (H) and (I) of paragraph (2), the denial of an enrollee’s request to exercise his or her right under Section 438.52(b)(2)(ii) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations to obtain services outside the network.

(G) The denial of an enrollee’s request to dispute a financial liability, including cost sharing, copayments, premiums, deductibles, coinsurance, and other enrollee financial liabilities.

(2) “Medi-Cal managed care plan” means any individual, organization, or
 entity that enters into a contract with the department to provide services to enrolled Medi-Cal beneficiaries pursuant to any of the following:

(A) Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 14087.3) of Chapter 7 of Part 3, including dental managed care programs developed pursuant to Section 14087.46.

(B) Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5) of Chapter 7 of Part 3.

(C) Article 2.81 (commencing with Section 14087.96) of Chapter 7 of Part 3.

(D) Article 2.82 (commencing with Section 14087.98) of Chapter 7 of Part 3.

(E) Article 2.9 (commencing with Section 14088) of Chapter 7 of Part 3.

(F) Article 2.91 (commencing with
 Section 14089) of Chapter 7 of Part 3.

(G) Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of Part 3, including dental managed care plans.

(H) Chapter 8.9 (commencing with Section 14700) of Part 3.

(I) A county Drug Medi-Cal organized delivery system authorized under the California Medi-Cal 2020 Demonstration, Number 11-W-00193/9, as approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and described in the Special Terms and Conditions. For purposes of this subdivision, “Special Terms and Conditions” shall have the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (o) of Section 14184.10.

(3) “Recipient” means an applicant for or recipient of public social services except aid exclusively financed by county funds or aid under Article 1 (commencing with
 Section 12000) to Article 6 (commencing with Section 12250), inclusive, of Chapter 3 of Part 3, and under Article 8 (commencing with Section 12350) of Chapter 3 of Part 3, or those activities conducted under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 18350) of Part 6, and shall include any individual who is an approved adoptive parent, as described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 8708 of the Family Code, and who alleges that he or she has been denied or has experienced delay in the placement of a child for adoption solely because he or she lives outside the jurisdiction of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 738, Sec. 2.   (AB 205)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

10951.

(a) (1) A person is not entitled to a hearing pursuant to this chapter unless he or she files his or her request for the same within 90 days after the order or action complained of.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a person shall be entitled to a hearing pursuant to this chapter if he or she files the request more than 90 days after the order or action complained of and there is good cause for filing the request beyond the 90-day period. The director may determine whether good cause exists. The department shall not grant a request for a hearing for good cause if the request is filed more than 180 days after the order or action complained of.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a person who is enrolled in a Medi-Cal managed care plan and who has received an adverse benefit determination from the Medi-Cal managed care plan shall, to the extent required by federal law or regulation, appeal the adverse benefit determination to the Medi-Cal managed care plan before requesting a state fair hearing pursuant to this chapter. After appealing to the Medi-Cal managed care plan, the enrollee may request a hearing pursuant to this chapter involving a Medi-Cal managed care plan within 120 calendar days after either of the following:

(A) The enrollee receives notice from the Medi-Cal managed care plan that the adverse benefit determination is upheld.

(B) The enrollee’s appeal is deemed exhausted because the Medi-Cal managed care plan failed to comply with state or federal requirements for notice and timeliness related
 to the disputed action or the appeal, including when a Medi-Cal managed care plan fails to respond to an appeal within 30 days as required pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 14197.3.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a person shall be entitled to a hearing pursuant to this chapter if he or she files the request more than 120 calendar days after receiving notice from the Medi-Cal managed care plan that the adverse benefit determination is upheld and there is good cause for filing the request beyond the 120-calendar day period. The director may determine whether good cause exists. The department shall not grant a request for a hearing for good cause if the request is filed more than 180 days after receipt of the notice from the Medi-Cal managed care plan that the adverse benefit determination is upheld.

(c) For purposes of this section, “good cause” means a substantial and
 compelling reason beyond the party’s control, considering the length of the delay, the diligence of the party making the request, and the potential prejudice to the other party. The inability of a person to understand an adequate and language-compliant notice, in and of itself, shall not constitute good cause.

(d) This section shall not preclude the application of the principles of equity jurisdiction as otherwise provided by law.

(e) Notwithstanding the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department, until January 1, 2019, may implement this section through an all-county information letter or similar instruction. The department may also provide further instructions through training notes.

(f) Notwithstanding
 subdivision (e), the department, by January 1, 2019, shall implement the amendments made to this section by the act that added this subdivision by adopting any necessary rules and regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 738, Sec. 3.   (AB 205)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

10951.5.

(a) For a beneficiary of a Medi-Cal managed care plan who meets the criteria for an expedited resolution of an appeal as set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 14197.3 or Section 438.410 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the department shall take final administrative action as expeditiously as the individual’s health condition requires, but no later than three working days after the department receives, from the Medi-Cal managed care plan, the case file and information for any appeal of an adverse benefit determination that, as indicated by the Medi-Cal managed care plan or determined by the administrative law judge, meets either of the following criteria:

(1) Meets the criteria for expedited resolution as set forth in Section 438.410(a) of Title 42
 of the Code of Federal Regulations, but was not resolved within the timeframe for expedited resolution.

(2) Was resolved within the timeframe for expedited resolution, but reached a decision wholly or partially adverse to the beneficiary.

(b) Upon notice from the department that a Medi-Cal managed care plan’s beneficiary has requested a state fair hearing, the Medi-Cal managed care plan shall provide to the department a copy of the following information within three business days of the Medi-Cal managed care plan’s receipt of the department’s notice of a request by a beneficiary for a state fair hearing:

(1) The case file.

(2) Information for any appeal of an adverse benefit determination that, as indicated by the Medi-Cal managed care plan, meets
 either of the criteria described in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a).

(c) (1) The department shall take final administrative action on a fair hearing request within the time limits set forth in this section except under either of the following unusual circumstances:

(A) The department cannot reach a decision because the beneficiary requests a delay or fails to take a required action.

(B) There is an administrative or other emergency beyond the department’s control.

(2) The department shall document the reasons for any delay in the beneficiary’s record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 230.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10952.

(a) The department shall set the hearing to commence within 30 working days after the request is filed, and, at least 10 days prior to the hearing, shall give all parties concerned written notice of the time and place of the hearing.

(b) The 30 working day and 10-day requirements described in subdivision (a) shall not apply to a request filed by a beneficiary of a Medi-Cal managed care plan who meets the criteria for an expedited resolution of an appeal as described in subdivision (a) of Section 10951.5.

(c) If regulations require a public or private agency to allow the applicant for, or recipient of, public social
 services to examine the case record or other relevant nonprivileged information, and the agency has been made aware of the issues in the appeal, the records and information shall be available for inspection by the applicant or recipient no later than five working days prior to the hearing. If the applicant requests the records and information to be delivered through electronic means, the records and information shall be delivered through secure electronic means if required by state or federal privacy laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 613, Sec. 2.   (SB 1071)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10952.5.

(a) If regulations require a public or private agency to write a position statement concerning the issues in question in a fair hearing, or if the public or private agency chooses to develop that statement, not less than two business days before the date of a hearing provided for pursuant to this chapter, the public or private agency shall make available to the applicant for, or recipient of, public social services requesting a fair hearing, a copy of the public or private agency’s position statement on the forthcoming hearing. The public or private agency shall make the copy available to the applicant or recipient at the county welfare department or via United States mail, or, upon request, through electronic means. Except as provided in
 subdivision (c), if the applicant or recipient requests a position statement to be delivered through electronic means, the position statement shall be delivered through secure electronic means if required by state or federal privacy laws. A public or private agency shall be required to comply with this section only if the public or private agency has received a 10-day prior notice of the date and time of the scheduled hearing. 

(b) (1) For a hearing to review the agency’s action or inaction regarding aid under the Aid to Families with Dependent Children-Foster Care program, the Approved Relative Caregiver Funding Program, the Emergency Caregiver Funding Program, the Kinship Guardianship Assistance Payment Program, and the Adoption Assistance Program, or for a hearing to review the agency’s denial of an application to
 be approved as a resource family, the agency shall include as attachments to the position statement copies of the portions of the juvenile case file that it used in making its decision to take the action that is being appealed. The attached portions of the juvenile case file shall remain confidential for purposes of the hearing, shall be available only to the judge or hearing officer and to the parties to the case, and shall not subsequently be released except in accordance with Section 827.

(2) Notwithstanding the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department, until January 1, 2024, may implement this subdivision through an all-county letter or similar instruction. The instruction shall classify the sections of the juvenile case file
 that will or may be pertinent to an
 administrative proceeding, and shall provide a process for the fair and prompt exchange of documents between the agency and attorney representatives receiving documents pursuant to subparagraph (S) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 827. The department may provide further instructions through training notes.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), the department, by January 1, 2024, shall implement this subdivision by adopting any necessary rules and regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(c) If the public or private agency does not make the position statement or documentary evidence available not less than two business
 days before the hearing or if the public or private agency decides to modify the position statement, the hearing shall be postponed upon the request of the applicant or recipient, if an applicant or recipient agrees to waive the right to obtain a decision on the hearing within the deadline that would otherwise be applicable under regulations. A postponement for reason of the public or private agency not making the position statement available within not less than two business days shall be deemed a postponement for good cause for purposes of determining eligibility to any applicable benefits pending disposition of the hearing.

(d) (1) A public or private agency shall not be required to make a copy of its position statement available to an applicant or recipient through electronic means if the agency submits a report by
 December 31 of each year to the State Department of Social Services that includes both of the following:
